Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.632

[Art. 78] Accessory after the fact.

Any person subject to this code who, knowing that an offense punishable by this code has been committed, receives, comforts, or assists the offender in order to hinder or prevent his or her apprehension, trial, or punishment shall be punished as a court martial may direct.

[ 2011 c 336 s 775; 1963 c 220 s 77.]